Utah statutes.
23-14-14.2.   Wildlife Resources Conservation Easement Restricted Account.

(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the Wildlife Resources Conservation Easement Account.

(2)  The Wildlife Resources Conservation Easement Account consists of:

(a)  grants from private foundations;

(b)  grants from local governments, the state, or the federal government;

(c)  grants from the Quality Growth Commission created under Section 11-38-201;

(d)  donations from landowners for monitoring and managing conservation easements;

(e)  donations from any other person; and

(f)  interest on account money.

(3)  Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the Division of Wildlife Resources shall use money from the account to monitor and manage conservation easements held by the division.

(4)  The division may not receive or expend donations from the account to acquire conservation easements.



Enacted by Chapter 189, 2007 General Session

